Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,162.19
Commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner; Attorney General; county attorney; duties.

It shall be the duty of each county attorney or the Attorney General, as the case may be, to whom any violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without delay.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 19, p. 1046.